Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-203] Certification of compliance.
A person engaged in the business of selling mopeds shall provide to the
director of finance of the county in which the mopeds are sold a certificate
from the moped manufacturer that each class, type or model of moped offered for
sale or sold meets the performance and equipment requirements of this part. [L
1978, c 175, pt of §15]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next